Utah statutes.
78B-4-503.   Immunity for transient shelters.

(1)  As used in this section, "transient shelter" means any person which provides shelter, food, clothing, or other products or services without consideration to indigent persons.

(2)  Except as provided in Subsection (3), all transient shelters, owners, operators, and employees of transient shelters, and persons who contribute products or services to transient shelters, are immune from suit for damages or injuries arising out of or related to the damaged or injured person's use of the products or services provided by the transient shelter.

(3)  This section does not prohibit an action against a person for damages or injury intentionally caused by that person or resulting from his gross negligence.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

